Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

14-13.7-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act".

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 624, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-102. Definitions.

In this article 13.7:

"Adult" means an individual who has attained eighteen years of age or who is an emancipated minor.

"Caretaking authority" means the right to live with and care for a child on a day-to-day basis. The term includes physical custody, parenting time, right to access, and visitation.

"Child" means:

An unemancipated individual who has not attained eighteen years of age; or

An adult son or daughter by birth or adoption, or under law of this state other than this article, who is the subject of a court order concerning custodial responsibility.

"Court" means a tribunal, including an administrative agency, authorized under law of this state other than this article to make, enforce, or modify a decision regarding custodial responsibility.

"Custodial responsibility" includes all powers and duties relating to caretaking authority and decision-making authority for a child. The term includes physical custody, legal custody, parenting time, right to access, visitation, and authority to grant limited contact with a child.

"Decision-making authority" means the power to make major decisions regarding a child, including decisions regarding the child's education, religious training, health care, extracurricular activities, and travel. The term does not include the power to make decisions that necessarily accompany a grant of caretaking authority.

"Deploying parent" means a service member who is deployed or has been notified of impending deployment and is:

A parent of a child under law of this state other than this article; or

An individual who has custodial responsibility for a child under law of this state other than this article.

"Deployment" means the movement or mobilization of a service member for more than ninety days but less than eighteen months pursuant to uniformed service orders that:

Are designated as unaccompanied;

Do not authorize dependent travel; or

Otherwise do not permit the movement of family members to the location to which the service member is deployed.

(8.5) "Deployment order" means a record provided by a uniformed service to a service member directing a deployment.

"Family member" means a sibling, aunt, uncle, cousin, stepparent, or grandparent of a child or an individual recognized to be in a familial relationship with a child under law of this state other than this article.

"Limited contact" means the authority of a nonparent to visit a child for a limited time. The term includes authority to take the child to a place other than the residence of the child.

"Nonparent" means an individual other than a deploying parent or other parent.

"Other parent" means an individual who, in common with a deploying parent, is:

A parent of a child under law of this state other than this article; or

An individual who has custodial responsibility for a child under law of this state other than this article.

"Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"Return from deployment" means the conclusion of a service member's deployment as specified in uniformed service orders.

"Service member" means a member of a uniformed service.

"Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt with a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

"State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

"Uniformed service" means:

Active and reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard of the United States;

The United States merchant marine;

The commissioned corps of the United States public health service;

The commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration of the United States; or

The National Guard of a state.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 624, § 2, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

IP and (18)(a) amended, (HB 21-1231), ch. 206, p. 1077, § 4, effective May 28.

14-13.7-103. (Reserved)

14-13.7-104. Jurisdiction.

A court may issue an order regarding custodial responsibility under this article only if the court has jurisdiction under article 13 of this title.

If a court has issued an interim order regarding custodial responsibility pursuant to part 3 of this article, the residence of the deploying parent is not changed by reason of the deployment for the purposes of article 13 of this title.

If a court has issued a permanent order regarding custodial responsibility before notice of deployment and the parents modify that order temporarily by agreement pursuant to part 2 of this article, the residence of the deploying parent is not changed by reason of the deployment for the purposes of article 13 of this title.

If a court in another state has issued an interim order regarding custodial responsibility as a result of impending or current deployment, the residence of the deploying parent is not changed by reason of the deployment for the purposes of article 13 of this title.

This section does not prevent a court from exercising emergency jurisdiction under article 13 of this title.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 627, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-105. Notification required of deploying parent.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section and subject to subsection (3) of this section, in cases where there has been a prior determination of custody, a deploying parent shall notify in a record the other parent of a pending deployment not later than twelve calendar days after receiving deployment orders unless reasonably prevented from doing so by the circumstances of service. If the circumstances of service prevent giving notification within twelve calendar days, the deploying parent shall give the notification as soon as reasonably possible.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section and subject to subsection (3) of this section, each parent shall provide in a record to the other parent a plan for fulfilling that parent's share of custodial responsibility during deployment. Each parent shall provide the plan as soon as reasonably possible after notification of deployment is given under subsection (1) of this section.

If a court order currently in effect prohibits disclosure of the address or contact information of the other parent, notification of deployment under subsection (1) of this section or notification of a plan for custodial responsibility during deployment under subsection (2) of this section may be made only to the issuing court. If the address of the other parent is available to the issuing court, the court shall forward the notification to the other parent. The court shall keep confidential the address or contact information of the other parent.

Notification in a record under subsection (1) or (2) of this section is not required if the parents are living in the same residence and both parents have actual notice of the deployment or plan.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 627, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-106. Duty to notify of change of address.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, an individual to whom custodial responsibility has been granted during deployment pursuant to part 2 or 3 of this article shall notify the deploying parent and any other individual with custodial responsibility of a child of any change of the individual's mailing address or residence until the grant is terminated. The individual shall provide the notice to any court that has issued a custody or child support order concerning the child which is in effect. This notice provision does not alter the provisions of section 14-10-129.

If a court order currently in effect prohibits disclosure of the address or contact information of an individual to whom custodial responsibility has been granted, a notification under subsection (1) of this section may be made only to the court that issued the order. The court shall keep confidential the mailing address or residence of the individual to whom custodial responsibility has been granted.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 628, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-107. General consideration in custody proceeding of parent's military service.

In a proceeding for custodial responsibility of a child of a service member, a parent's past deployment or possible future deployment in itself may not serve as the sole basis in determining the best interest of the child. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the court from applying section 14-10-124 in determining the best interest of the child.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 628, § 2, effective May 10.